District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.58

Separation pay.

(a)

A subordinate agency head may be paid separation pay of up to 12 weeks of his or her basic pay upon separation from the government at the discretion of the Mayor; provided that, the agency head has been a District government employee for at least one year prior to the separation; otherwise the separation pay shall not exceed 4 weeks of the agency head’s basic pay.

(b)

(1)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, Charles H. Ramsey, Chief of Police, shall be paid separation pay equivalent to up to 6 months of his basic pay upon involuntary separation from the District government by the Mayor if the involuntary separation is without cause.

(2)

If Chief Ramsey is involuntarily separated without cause at any time during the last 6 months of his term, as that term is set forth in § 5-105.01(c), he shall be entitled to separation pay equal to the actual number of days remaining in his term.

(c)

(1)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, Cathy L. Lanier, Chief of Police, shall be paid separation pay in a lump sum equivalent to 4 months of her basic pay upon involuntary separation from the District government if the separation is without “material failure,” or for a “good reason,” as those terms are described in an employment agreement between the District of Columbia and Cathy L. Lanier, Chief of Police, dated May 8, 2012.

(2)

If Chief Lanier is involuntarily separated without material failure or for a good reason, Chief Lanier and her eligible dependents shall be entitled to continue to participate in the District of Columbia’s health and welfare insurance plans, in which Chief Lanier participated immediately before the date of termination and at the same contribution rates as active employees:

(A)

For the 6-month period following the date of termination, or the balance of her term if less than 6 months remain; or

(B)

Until she obtains employment with comparable benefits, whichever occurs first.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1058
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(m), 45 DCR 2464
Mar. 7, 2000, D.C. Law 13-52, § 3, 46 DCR 9911
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-199, § 2, 53 DCR 8832
Dec. 21, 2012, D.C. Law 19-205, § 3, 59 DCR 12472
1981 Ed., § 1-611.58.
D.C. Law 13-52 added “provided that, the agency head has been a District government employee for at least one year prior to the separation; otherwise the separation pay shall not exceed 4 weeks of the agency head’s basic pay”.
D.C. Law 16-199 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-205 added (c).
Applicability of § 101(m) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-610.51.